Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3614
Board; appointment of members; procedure.

Members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor on a nonpartisan basis. Candidates for appointment by the Governor to the initial board may place their names on a candidacy list for the respective district by filing a petition signed by at least fifty growers of such district with the Governor. Candidates for appointment to subsequent boards or to fill a vacancy in either a district or at-large membership position shall file such petitions with the existing board. Qualified individuals residing within their district shall be eligible for nomination as candidates from such district.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1336, § 4.